Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 3
Property and Liability Insurance

§ 28-44-301. Property insurance.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance against loss of or damage to property unless the creditor qualifies under chapter 9, title 41, Idaho Code, or rule or regulation prescribed by the director of the department of insurance and:

The insurance covers a substantial risk of loss of or damage to property related to the credit transaction;

The amount, terms, and conditions of the insurance are reasonable in relation to the character and value of the property insured or to be insured; and

The term of the insurance is reasonable in relation to the terms of credit.

The term of the insurance is reasonable if it is customary and does not extend substantially beyond a scheduled maturity.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance against loss of or damage to property unless the amount financed or principal exclusive of charges for the insurance is five hundred dollars ($500) or more, and the value of the property is five hundred dollars ($500) or more.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-301, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-302. Insurance on creditor’s interest only.

If a creditor contracts for or receives a separate charge for insurance against loss of or damage to property, the risk of loss or damage not willfully caused by the debtor is on the debtor only to the extent of any deficiency in the effective coverage of the insurance, even though the insurance covers only the interest of the creditor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-302, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-303. Liability insurance.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance against liability unless the insurance covers a substantial risk of liability arising out of the ownership or use of property related to the credit transaction.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-303, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-304. Cancellation by creditor.

A creditor shall not request cancellation of a policy of property or liability insurance except after the debtor’s default or in accordance with a written authorization by the debtor, and in either case the cancellation does not take effect until written notice is delivered to the debtor or mailed to him at his address as stated by him. The notice shall state that the policy may be cancelled on a date not less than ten (10) days after the notice is delivered or, if the notice is mailed, not less than thirteen (13) days after it is mailed.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-304, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.